Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.901

Construction—1965 c 153.

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to authorize any escrow agent, or his or her employees or agents, to engage in the practice of law, and nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to impose any additional liability on any depositary authorized by this chapter and the receipt or acquittance of the persons so paid by such depositary shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of such depositary.

[ 2011 c 336 s 485; 1965 c 153 s 20. Formerly RCW 18.44.900.]